Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-181
Exclusion of lands; copy of order filed with recorder; effect.

Upon the entry in the minutes of the board of any of the orders hereinbefore mentioned, a copy thereof certified by the president and secretary of the board shall be filed for record in the recorder's office of each county within which are situated any of the lands of the district; and thereupon the district shall be and remain an irrigation district as fully, to every intent and purpose, as it would be had no change been made in the boundaries of the district, or had the lands excluded therefrom never constituted a portion of the district.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 54, p. 300;

R.S.1913, § 3511;

C.S.1922, § 2911;

C.S.1929, § 46-156;

R.S.1943, § 46-181.

Original boundaries, filing of order, see section 46-111.